Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB93.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:(1) Rosh Hashanah, the Jewish New Year, marks the beginning of the High Holidays and signifies a time for reflection and celebration.(2) Yom Kippur, the Day of Atonement, is the holiest day in Judaism, representing the end of the High Holidays, and is dedicated to prayer, fasting and introspection.(3) Eid al-Fitr, the Festival of Breaking the Fast, commemorates the end of Ramadan, a month of fasting for Muslims, and is celebrated with prayers, feasts and acts of charity.1234567891011121314151617 (4) Eid al-Adha, the Festival of Sacrifice, is considered one of holiest holidays in the Islamic calendar and is similarly celebrated through prayers and acts of service.(5) This Commonwealth was founded on the principles of religious freedom and tolerance, and these holidays, celebrated by many Pennsylvanians, deserve official recognition.Section 2. Designations.(a) Jewish tradition.--In accordance with longstanding Jewish tradition:(1) The first day of the Hebrew month of Tishri shall be designated as Rosh Hashanah Day in this Commonwealth.(2) The tenth day of the Hebrew month of Tishri shall be designated as Yom Kippur Day in this Commonwealth.(b) Islamic tradition.--In accordance with longstanding Islamic tradition:(1) The first day of the Islamic month of Shawwal shall be designated as Eid al-Fitr Day in this Commonwealth.(2) The tenth day of the Islamic month of Dhu al-Hijjah shall be designated as Eid al-Adha Day in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat a day designated under section 2 as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on a day designated under section 2 solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0093PN0076 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829